Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-203
When effective.

If it shall appear by the returns of said election that a majority of the legal voters of such county voting upon the proposition are for township organization, then the office of county commissioner and the board of county commissioners shall cease to exist on and after the meeting of the supervisors of the county as hereinafter provided, and the county so voting for the adoption of township organization shall thereafter be governed by and subject to the provisions of sections 23-201 to 23-299.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 3, p. 131;

R.S.1913, § 989;

C.S.1922, § 889;

Laws 1927, c. 53, § 1, p. 208;

C.S.1929, § 26-203;

R.S.1943, § 23-203;

Laws 1947, c. 64, § 1, p. 210.